Utah statutes.
58-56-14.   Modification of factory built housing units and modular units.

(1)  A modification to factory built housing units shall be made in accordance with the following:

(a)  Prior to set-up, modification to a manufactured home or mobile home prior to installation or set-up of the unit for habitation shall be made in accordance with the HUD code.

(b)  After set-up:

(i)  modification to a manufactured home or mobile home after installation or set-up of the unit for habitation, which modification does not include the addition of any space to the existing unit or the attachment of any structure to the existing unit shall be made in accordance with the HUD code; and

(ii)  modification to a manufactured home or mobile home after installation or set-up of the unit for habitation, which modification includes the addition of any space to the existing unit or the attachment of any structure to the unit shall be made as follows:

(A)  modifications to the existing unit shall be in accordance with the HUD code; and

(B)  additional structure outside of the existing unit shall be in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  A modification to a modular housing unit shall be made in accordance with this chapter.

